Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-102] Facilities and services by
counties to authority and tenants. Each county within which the authority
may own, operate, or administer any public housing project or complex and to
which, or for whose benefit, the authority or its predecessors in interest has
made (by payment to the county) or may hereafter make, gifts or donations
including any payment in lieu of taxes, upon request of the authority, shall
provide and furnish to the authority in regard to every public housing project
or complex, and to the tenants and other occupants of the housing project, free
of charge and without condition or other requirement, all the facilities,
services, and privileges as it provides or furnishes, with or without charge or
other consideration, to any person or persons. The facilities and services may
include police protection, fire protection, street lighting, paving
maintenance, traffic control, garbage or trash collection and disposal, use of
streets or highways, use of county incinerators or garbage dumps, storm
drainage, and sewage disposal. In addition, each county, upon request of the
authority and free of charge and without condition or other requirement, shall
open or close, but not construct or reconstruct, streets, roads, highways,
alleys, or other facilities within any public housing project or complex within
the county. Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict or limit
the power of the authority to agree to pay, or to pay, for any and all of the
facilities, services, and privileges, if in its discretion it deems the payment
advisable. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next